New Jersey, session 221, S1538.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.41) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  If all appropriate enforcement methods to collect child support arrearage have been exhausted and the child support arrearage equals or exceeds the amount of child support payable for six months or court-ordered health care coverage for the child is not provided for six months, or the obligor fails to respond to a subpoena relating to a paternity or child support action[, or a child support-related warrant exists,] and the obligor is found to possess a license in the State [and all appropriate enforcement methods to collect the child support arrearage have been exhausted], the Probation Division shall send a written notice to the obligor, [by certified and regular mail, return receipt requested] in accordance with the Rules of Court, at the obligor's last-known address or place of business or employment, advising the obligor that the obligor's license may be revoked or suspended unless, within 30 days of the postmark date of the notice, the obligor pays the full amount of the child support arrearage, or provides proof that health care coverage for the child has been obtained, or responds to a subpoena, or makes a written request for a court hearing to the Probation Division, or reaches an agreement with the Probation Division on a payment amount that is approved the Court including the resumption of timely ongoing support payments.  [If a child support- related warrant for the obligor exists, the professional, occupational, recreational or sporting license revocation or suspension shall be terminated if the obligor pays the full amount of the child support arrearage, provides proof that health care coverage for the child has been obtained as required by the court order, or surrenders to the county sheriff or the Probation Division.] b.    If the obligor fails to take one of the actions in subsection a. of this section within 30 days of the postmark date of the notice and there is proof that service on the obligor was effective, the Probation Division [shall] may file a certification with the court setting forth the obligor's non-compliance with the support order and the obligor's failure to respond to the written notice of the potential license suspension or revocation.  If, based on the papers filed by the Probation Division, the court is satisfied that service on the obligor was effective as set forth in this section, it shall without need for further due process or hearing, enter a court order suspending or revoking all licenses held by the obligor for which they have been previously noticed.  Upon the entry of the order, the Probation Division shall forward a copy to the obligor and all appropriate licensing authorities. For the purposes of this section, the court may deem procedural due process requirements for notice and service of process to be met with respect to a party thereto upon delivery of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address filed with the Probation Division for that party.  If a party fails to respond to a notice and no proof is available that the party received the notice, the Probation Division shall document to the court that it has made a diligent effort to locate the party by making inquiries that may include, but are not limited to: the United States Postal Service, the [Division of] New Jersey Motor Vehicles [in the Department of Transportation] Commission, the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury and the Departments of Labor and Corrections.  The Probation Division shall provide [an affidavit] a certification to the court presenting such documentation of its diligent effort, which certifies its inability to locate the party, before any adverse action is taken based upon the party's failure to respond to the notice. c.     If the obligor requests a hearing, the Probation Division shall file a petition for a judicial hearing in accordance with section 5 of P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.43).  The hearing shall occur within 45 days of the obligor's request.  If, at or prior to the hearing, the obligor pays the full amount of the child support arrearage or provides health care coverage as ordered, or responds to the subpoena [or surrenders to the county sheriff or the Probation Division] or reaches an agreement with the Probation Division on a payment amount that is approved the Court including the resumption of timely ongoing support payments, the license revocation process shall be terminated.  No license revocation action shall be initiated if the Probation Division has received notice that the obligor has pending a motion to modify the child support order if that motion was filed prior to the date that the notice of the license suspension or revocation was sent by the Probation Division.  The court shall consider the Probation Division's petition to revoke or suspend a license in accordance with section 5 of P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.43). (cf: P.L.2019, c.276, s.2) 2.    Section 5 of P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.43) is amended to read as follows: 5.    The court [shall] may suspend or revoke a license if it finds that: a. all appropriate enforcement methods have been exhausted, b. the obligor is the holder of a license, c. the requisite child support arrearage amount exists, health care coverage has not been provided as ordered pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.41), or there has been no response to a subpoena, d. no motion to modify the child support order, filed prior to the date that the notice of the license suspension or revocation was sent by the Probation Division, is pending before the court, and e. there is no equitable reason, such as involuntary unemployment, disability, or compliance with a court-ordered plan for the periodic payment of the child support arrearage amount, for the obligor's non-compliance with the child support order. If the court is satisfied that these conditions exist, it [shall] may first consider suspending or revoking a driver's license prior to a professional or recreational license.  If the obligor fails to appear at the hearing after being properly served with notice, the court [shall] may order the suspension or revocation of all licenses held by the obligor.  In the case of a driver's license, if the court finds that the license revocation or suspension will result in a significant hardship to the obligor, to the obligor's legal dependents [under 18 years of  age] living in the obligor's household, to the obligor's employees, or to persons, businesses or entities to whom the obligor provides goods or services, the court may allow the obligor to pay [25%] a lump sum as determined by the court of the past-due child support amount within a time frame determined by the court, but not to exceed [three] ten working days of the hearing, establish a payment schedule to satisfy the remainder of the arrearages within [one year] a time period as determined by the court, but not to exceed five years, and require that the obligor comply with any current child support obligation.  If the obligor agrees to this arrangement, no suspension or revocation of any licenses shall be ordered.  Compliance with the payment agreement shall be monitored by the Probation Division.  If the obligor has good cause for not complying with the payment agreement within the time permitted by the court, the obligor shall immediately file a motion or application with the court and with notice to the Probation Division requesting an extension, modification, or both an extension and modification of the payment plan. The court may extend the payment plan if it is satisfied that the obligor has made a good faith effort to comply with the plan and is unable to satisfy the full amount of past-due support within the time permitted due to circumstances beyond the obligor's control.  [In no case shall a payment plan extend beyond the date the dependent child reaches the age of 18.] If the obligor fails to comply with the court-ordered payment schedule, the court [shall] may, upon receipt of a certification of non-compliance from the obligee or Probation Division, and without further hearing, order the immediate revocation or suspension of all licenses held by the obligor.  If required by existing law or regulation, the court shall order that the obligor surrender the license to the issuing authority within 30 days of the date of the order. (cf: P.L.1998, c.1, s.29) 3.    Section 2 of P.L.1982, c.417 (C.2A:17-56.8) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Every complaint, notice or pleading for the entry or modification of a support order and every court order which includes child support shall include a written notice to the obligor stating that the child support provision of the order shall, and the health care coverage provision may, as appropriate, be enforced by an income withholding upon the current or future income due from the obligor's employer or successor employers and upon the unemployment compensation benefits due the obligor and against debts, income, trust funds, profits or income from any other source due the obligor except as provided in section 3 of P.L.1981, c.417 (C.2A:17-56.9).  The written notice shall also state that the driver's license and professional or occupational licenses, or recreational or sporting license in accordance with P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.41 et seq.) held or applied for by the obligor may be denied, suspended or revoked if: the child support arrearage is equal to or exceeds the amount of child support payable for six months; the obligor fails to provide health care coverage for the children as ordered by the court for six months; or the obligor fails to respond to a subpoena relating to a paternity or child support proceeding[; or a warrant for the obligor's arrest has been issued by the court due to failure to pay child support as ordered, failure to appear at a hearing to establish paternity or child support, or failure to appear at a hearing to enforce a child support order and said warrant remains outstanding]. The written notice shall also state that the amount of a child support order and the provisions for health care coverage may be reviewed and updated when there has been a change in circumstances or in accordance with section 5 of P.L.1990, c.92 (C.2A:17-56.9a). The court shall ensure that in the case of each obligor against whom a support order is or has been issued or modified, the obligor's income shall be withheld to comply with the order.  An amount shall be withheld to pay the support obligation and it shall include an amount to be applied toward liquidation of arrearages reduced to judgments, payments for paternity testing procedures and provisions for health care coverage when applicable.  These provisions shall also be applicable to all orders issued on or before the effective date of P.L.1985, c.278 (C.2A:17-56.16 et seq.). A support provision contained in an order or judgment issued by the court shall be paid by income withholding unless the order or judgment specifically provides for an alternative payment arrangement to which the parties agree in writing or the obligor or obligee demonstrates and the court finds good cause for establishing an alternative arrangement. (cf: P.L.1998, c.1, s.18) 4.    Section 6. of P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.44) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a. The Probation Division shall provide the licensing authority with a copy of the order requiring the suspension or revocation of a license.  Upon receipt of an order requiring the suspension or revocation of a license, the licensing authority shall immediately notify the licensee of the effective date of the suspension or revocation, which shall be 20 days after the postmark of the notice, direct the licensee to refrain from engaging in the activity associated with the license, surrender any license as required by law, and inform the licensee that the license shall not be reinstated until the court or Probation Division certifies that the conditions which resulted in the suspension or revocation are satisfied.  The Probation Division and the State IV-D agency in association with the affected licensing authorities may develop electronic or magnetic tape data transfers to notify licensing authorities of restrictions, suspensions, revocations and reinstatements.  No liability shall be imposed on a licensing authority for suspending or revoking a license if the action is in response to a court order issued in accordance with P.L.1996, c.7(C.2A:17-56.41 et seq.). Licensing authorities shall not have jurisdiction to modify, remand, reverse, vacate or stay a court order to restrict, suspend or revoke a license for non-payment of child support. b.    If a licensee, upon receipt of the notice of suspension or revocation from the licensing authority, disputes that he is an obligor, the licensee shall notify the licensing authority and the Probation Division by registered mail within 20 days of the postmark of the notice and request a hearing.  Upon receipt of the licensee's request for a hearing, the Probation Division shall determine if the licensee is an obligor.  If the Probation Division determines that the licensee is an obligor, the Probation Division shall file a petition for a judicial hearing on the issue of whether the licensee is an obligor.  The hearing shall occur within 30 days.  If the Probation Division determines that the licensee is not an obligor, the Probation Division shall so notify the licensee and the licensing authority.  The licensing authority shall not suspend or revoke a person's license, if the licensing authority received proper notice of the licensee's request for a hearing pursuant to this subsection, until the court finds that the licensee is an obligor. The Probation Division shall notify the licensing authority of the court's finding.  Upon receipt of the court's finding that the licensee is an obligor, the licensing authority shall immediately suspend or revoke the obligor's license without additional review or hearing. c.     The revocation or suspension of a license ordered by the court in accordance with P.L.1996, c.7 (C.2A:17-56.41 et seq.) shall continue until the Probation Division or the obligor files with the licensing authority a certified court order restoring the license. d.    Each licensing authority shall require license applicants to certify on the license application form, under penalty of perjury, that the applicant does not have a child support obligation, the applicant does have such an obligation but the arrearage amount does not equal or exceed the amount of child support payable for six months and any court-ordered health care coverage has been provided for the past six months, or the applicant has not failed to respond to a subpoena relating to a paternity or child support proceeding[, or the applicant is not the subject of a child-support related warrant]. A license shall not be granted to an obligor who applies for a license if there is an arrearage equal to or exceeding the amount of child support payable for six months, the applicant has not provided court-ordered health care coverage during the past six months or the applicant has failed to respond to a subpoena relating to a paternity or child support proceeding [or is the subject of a child support-related warrant]. The application form shall state that making a false statement may subject the applicant to contempt of court.  It shall also state that if the applicant's certification is found to be false, the licensing authority shall take disciplinary action including, but not limited to, immediate revocation or suspension of the license. e.     For all licenses issued or renewed in the State after the effective date of P.L.1996, c.7(C.2A:17-56.41 et seq.), the licensing authority shall record the full name, mailing address, Social Security number and date of birth of the applicant or licensee.  All affected licensing authorities shall cooperate and enter into agreements with the Probation Division and the State IV-D agency to exchange information to effectuate the purposes of P.L.1996, c.7(C.2A:17-56.41 et seq.).  The Division of Motor Vehicles in the Department of Transportation and other appropriate licensing agencies shall amend their regulations and public notices to permit Social Security numbers collected by those agencies to be used for child support enforcement purposes.  License information obtained through data matches with licensing authorities shall be maintained on the State case registry in the Department of Human Services for future use. (cf: P.L.1998, c.1, s.30) 5.    Section 4 of P.L.1997, c.172 (C.56.11-31) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  A consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer report under the following circumstances and no other: (1)   In response to the order of a court having jurisdiction to issue such an order, or a subpoena issued in connection with proceedings before a State or federal grand jury. (2)   In accordance with the written instructions of the consumer to whom it relates. (3)   To a person which it has reason to believe: (a)   intends to use the information in connection with a credit transaction involving the consumer on whom the information is to be furnished and involving the extension of credit to, or review or collection of an account of, the consumer; (b)   intends to use the information for employment purposes; (c)   intends to use the information in connection with the underwriting of insurance involving the consumer; (d)   intends to use the information in connection with a determination of the consumer's eligibility for a license or other benefit granted by a governmental instrumentality required by law to consider an applicant's financial responsibility or status; (e)   intends to use the information, as a potential investor or servicer, or current insurer, in connection with a valuation of, or an assessment of the credit or prepayment risks associated with, an existing credit obligation; or (f)   otherwise has a legitimate business need for the information: (i)    in connection with a business transaction that is initiated by the consumer; or (ii)   to review an account to determine whether the consumer continues to meet the terms of the account. (4)   In response to a request by the head of a State or local child support enforcement agency (or a State or local government official authorized by the head of such an agency), if the person making the request certifies to the consumer reporting agency that: (a)   the consumer report is needed for the purpose of establishing an individual's capacity to make child support payments or determining the appropriate level of those payments; (b)   the paternity of the consumer for the child to which the obligation relates has been established or acknowledged by the consumer in accordance with State laws under which the obligation arises (if required by those laws); (c)   [the person has provided at least 10 days' prior notice to the consumer whose report is requested, by certified or registered mail to the last known address of the consumer, that the report will be requested; and (d)] the consumer report will be kept confidential, will be used solely for a purpose described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and will not be used in connection with any other civil, administrative, or criminal proceeding, or for any other purpose. (5)   To an agency administering a state plan under 42 U.S.C. s.654 for use to set an initial or modified child support award. b.    A consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer report for employment purposes only if: (1)   the person who obtains the report from the agency certifies to the agency that: (a)   the person has complied with subsection c. of this section with respect to the consumer report, and the person will comply with subsection d. of this section with respect to the consumer report if that subsection becomes applicable; and (b)   information from the consumer report will not be used in violation of any applicable federal or state equal employment opportunity law or regulation; and (2)   the consumer reporting agency provides with the report a summary of the consumer's rights under the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act," 15 U.S.C. s.1681 et seq. c.     A person may not procure a consumer report, or cause a consumer report to be procured, for employment purposes with respect to any consumer, unless: (1)   a clear and conspicuous disclosure has been made in writing to the consumer at any time before the report is procured or caused to be procured, in a document that consists solely of the disclosure, that a consumer report may be obtained for employment purposes; and (2)   the consumer has authorized in writing the procurement of the report by that person. d.    A consumer reporting agency shall not furnish for employment purposes, or in connection with a credit or insurance transaction or a direct marketing transaction, a consumer report that contains medical information about a consumer unless the consumer consents to the furnishing of the report in writing. e.     In using a consumer report for employment purposes, before taking any adverse action based in whole or in part on the report, the person intending to take an adverse action shall provide to the consumer to whom the report relates: (1)   a copy of the report; and (2)   a description in writing of the rights of the consumer under this act and the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act," 15 U.S.C. s.1681 et seq. f.     Consumer reporting agencies may furnish a consumer report relating to any consumer pursuant to subparagraph (a) or (c) of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of this section in connection with any credit or insurance transaction that is not authorized by the consumer only if the consumer reporting agency complies with the requirements of subsections (c) and (e) of section 604 of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act," 15 U.S.C. s.1681b. g.    A person shall not use or obtain a consumer report for any purpose unless: (1)   the consumer report is obtained for a purpose for which the consumer report is authorized to be furnished under this section; and (2)   the purpose for its use is certified in accordance with section 5 of this act by a prospective user of the report. (cf: P.L.1997, c.172,s.4) 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.